Nevada, session 83, SB143.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 218E.330 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218E.330 1. A Joint Interim Standing Committee may:
-
*SB143*

– 2 –
(a) Evaluate and review issues within the jurisdiction of the
corresponding standing committee or committees from the
preceding regular session;
(b) Exercise any of the investigative powers set forth in NRS
218E.105 to 218E.140, inclusive; and
(c) Within the limits of the Committee’s budget, conduct studies
directed by the Legislature or the Legislative Commission.
2. In addition to the authorized scope of issues set forth in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1:
(a) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services shall, either as part of its regular work or through
appointment of a subcommittee, evaluate and review issues relating
to child welfare.
(b) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary shall,
either as part of its regular work or through appointment of a
subcommittee, evaluate and review issues relating to juvenile
justice.
(c) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Legislative
Operations and Elections may evaluate and review issues relating to
governmental purchasing, including, without limitation,
recommendations submitted to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee by the Commission to Study Governmental Purchasing
pursuant to NRS 332.215.
(d) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Natural
Resources may evaluate and review issues relating to water
conservation, including, without limitation, efforts to conserve
water, goals for water conservation, incentive programs and water
rates and charges of the municipal water providers in the states
composing the Colorado River Basin.
3. The Legislative Commission shall review and approve the
budget and work program of each Joint Interim Standing Committee
and any changes to the budget or work program.
4. A Joint Interim Standing Committee shall prepare a
comprehensive report of the Committee’s activities in the interim
and its findings and any recommendations for proposed legislation.
The report must be submitted to the Director for distribution to the
next regular session.
Sec. 2. 1. The Division of Environmental Protection of the
State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall
conduct a study during the 2025-2026 legislative interim regarding
the use of artificial turf and synthetic grass.
2. The study must include, without limitation:
(a) An evaluation of the types of:
(1) Artificial turf and synthetic grass that are available for
use;
-
*SB143*

– 3 –
(2) Materials that comprise artificial turf and synthetic grass;
and
(3) Artificial turf and synthetic grass that are in use in this
State and in any other state composing the Colorado River Basin;
and
(b) Recommendations for the types of artificial turf and
synthetic grass that are appropriate to use and install in this State.
3. On or before August 1, 2026, the Division shall submit a
report of the results of the study to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the 84th Session of the Nevada
Legislature.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB143*